District of Columbia statutes.
34-1601

Inspector of Gas and Meters.

A suitable and impartial person, competent as a chemist, who is not a stockholder or employee in any gas works, shall be appointed by the Public Service Commission to be designated and known as Inspector of Gas and Meters, whose duties shall be to test and determine the illuminating power and purity of the gas furnished by any company, person, or persons in the District of Columbia; and to test, prove, and seal all meters that may be hereafter used by them. The Inspector shall give bond to the extent of double his annual salary, and shall take an oath or affirmation, before some officer legally qualified to administer the same, that he will faithfully, diligently, and impartially discharge the duties of his office.

June 23, 1874, 18 Stat. 278, 279, ch. 480, §§ 2, 10
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
1973 Ed., § 43-605.
1981 Ed., § 43-1005.